indra/newview/app_settings/dictionaries/da_dk.dic
uretmæssig/207,70,366,976
uopfindsom/1025,366,976
ulmende/916,976
ugeneret/70,1062
uforvekslelig/207,70,366,976
udspring/70,252,10,976,939,947
udkøre/140,143,148
ubestikkelighed/193,70,976
uagtsom/1025,366,976
tøfle/6,143,148
tusindtallig/207,70,366,976
trættekær/70,962,366
træthed/193,70,976,939,947
tro/976
triviel/1106,70,366
tribun/70,73,7,976,940,947
tiltagende/916,976
tilmelde/140,143,148
tidsforløb/70,252,10,976
tidsbetinget/70,1062
termotøj/194,70,976
taoistisk/917,976
tangent/70,73,7,976,941,947
sølaks/70,7,252,976
sødgrød/193,70,976
synde/6,143,148,941,947
sygdom/70,133,976,939,947
svigten/190,976
sukkergod/70,962,366
suge/6,143,148,941,947
stænk/70,252,10,976,940,947
straf/70,133,976,941,947
statelig/207,70,366,976
sprødstege/140,143,148
sparsom/1025,366,976
sommerslot/70,132,976
småkriminel/1106,70,366
småbørnsmorens/976
smuld/194,70,976,941,947
smile/6,143,148,941,947
sluttende/916,976
slot/70,132,976,939,947
slags/70,7,252,976,941,947
slagfejl/70,7,252,976
skælm/20,7,70,976,940,947
skarptandet/70,1062
selvbedragerisk/917,976
seksårig/70,962,366
samtid/193,70,976,939,947
salve/6,143,148
saltholdig/207,70,366,976
sake/190,976
råstege/140,143,148
rørdrum/70,133,976
rædsom/1025,366,976
rosen/190,976,941,947
rockwool/193,70,976
renæssanceslot/70,132,976
reje/70,73,7,976,941,947
regelbundnest/976
redebon/1106,70,366
påfaldende/916,976
pust/70,252,10,976
proportion/70,73,7,976,939,947
polyteknisk/917,976
polaris/193,70,976,940,947
plet/194,70,976,941,947
pengestrøm/70,133,976
overlocke/6,143,148
overkomplet/207,70,366,976
overgearet/70,1062
ordrig/70,962,366
opbruge/140,143,148
officiel/1106,70,366
nøl/190,976
nyre/70,73,7,976,941,947
notabel/70,976
nettogæld/193,70,976
neolitisk/917,976
nationalflag/70,252,10,976
måler/20,7,70,976,941,947
møjsom/1025,366,976
modstræbende/916,976
mellemgulv/194,70,976
mask/193,70,976,940,947
mart/70,10,73,976,939,947
malplacere/6,143,148
magnetiseringsstrøm/70,133,976
lysteknisk/917,976
loge/70,73,7,976
liggesyg/70,962,366
ligefrem/1106,70,366
lejer/20,7,70,976,941,947
legitimationskort/70,252,10,976
legemlig/207,70,366,976
laset/70,1062
lambswool/190,976
kvide/193,70,976
konkurrenceforvridende/916,976
kompromis/70,10,73,976,941,947
knivsæg/70,133,976
klækkeri/194,70,976
kildekritisk/917,976
kenderblik/70,132,976
kedsom/1025,366,976
karry/193,70,976,941,947
kandelaber/70,7,252,976
kameravinklers/976
judiciel/1106,70,366
inklinere/6,143,148
indtægtsføre/140,143,148
indholdstung/70,962,366
indgang/20,7,70,976,939,947
højrygget/70,1062
høg/20,7,70,976,940,947
hvæsen/190,976
huk/70,133,976
hittitisk/917,976
hikke/193,70,976
helsebringende/916,976
gylden/976
grøn/1106,70,366
gro/6,143,148,941,947
glide/941,947
gennemstege/140,143,148
gennemblæse/140,143,148
gejl/194,70,976
gammelsproglig/207,70,366,976
galimatias/190,976
følsom/1025,366,976
fødselsøjeblik/70,132,976
futil/70,962,366
fundament/70,10,73,976,940,947
frihedsstraf/70,133,976
forsnævret/70,1062
forråde/140,143,148
forhud/193,70,976,939,947
folkesocialistisk/917,976
fodslag/70,252,10,976
flagrende/916,976
fiskefartøjers/976
fastspænding/193,70,976
falkeblik/70,132,976
eskortere/6,143,148
elevator/70,73,7,976,941,947
ekvivok/1106,70,366
dødsøjeblik/70,132,976
dvælen/190,976
driftig/207,70,366,976
disk/20,7,70,976,940,947
direktion/70,73,7,976,939,947
destruktiv/70,962,366
dam/70,133,976,941,947
børnetøj/194,70,976
bølgeformet/70,1062
blik/70,132,976
bessermachen/190,976
beredskab/194,70,976,939,947
belåne/140,143,148
behandle/6,143,148
barnedåb/193,70,976
atavistisk/917,976
argument/70,10,73,976,940,947
arbejdsom/1025,366,976
anråb/70,252,10,976
anmassende/916,976
ankler/976
andedam/70,133,976
albue/6,143,148,941,947
central/913,70,366,976,941,947
forskellig/913,70,366,976
enkelt/913,70,366,976,941,947
filvælger/20,7,70,976,941,947
symbolsk/913,70,366,976,941,947
vejledning/70,73,7,976,939,947
proprietær/913,70,366,976,941,947
vis/70,962,366
øjeblik/70,132,976
ørkensand/194,70,976
central/70,915,976,941,947
uddannelsesmæssig/913,70,366,976
emnemæssig/913,70,366,976
uvægerlig/913,70,366,976
iterativ/913,70,366,976
